Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.

§ 16.1-278.
Cooperation of certain agencies, officials, institutions and associations.

The judge may order, after notice and opportunity to be heard, any state, county or municipal officer or employee or any governmental agency or other governmental institution to render only such information, assistance, services and cooperation as may be provided for by state or federal law or an ordinance of any city, county or town.The officer, employee, agency or institution may appeal such order to the circuit court in accordance with §

16.1-296

. The circuit court shall advance such appeals on its docket and may stay the order of the juvenile court during the pendency of the appeal. The circuit court may affirm or reverse the order of the juvenile court. Upon reversal, the circuit court may remand the case to the juvenile court for an alternative disposition.

The court is authorized to cooperate with and make use of the services of all public or private societies or organizations which seek to protect or aid children or families, in order that the court may be assisted in giving the children and families within its jurisdiction such care, protection and assistance as will best enhance their welfare.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-156; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1980, c. 245.

Cross references.

For the contents of petition in certain proceedings pursuant to this section, see Rule 8:3, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For 1995 survey of legal issues involving children, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1117 (1995).

For an article relating to all published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 1997, and July 1, 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1091 (1998).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 32 Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts; Family Courts; Small Claims Courts; Commissioners in Chancery: Local Rules of Court. § 32.02 Proceedings in Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts.
Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2508. Disposition Order-—Juvenile.

§ 16.1-278.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Parent”
includes parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis.

“Public service project”
means any governmental or quasi-governmental agency project or any project of a nonprofit corporation or association operated exclusively for charitable or community purposes.

History.

1991, c. 534.

§ 16.1-278.2.
Abused, neglected, or abandoned children or children without parental care.

Within 60 days of a preliminary removal order hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-252

or a hearing on a preliminary protective order held pursuant to §

16.1-253

, a dispositional hearing shall be held if the court found abuse or neglect and (i) removed the child from his home or (ii) entered a preliminary protective order. Notice of the dispositional hearing shall be provided to the child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis in accordance with §

16.1-263

. The hearing shall be held and a dispositional order may be entered, although a parent, guardian, legal custodian, or person standing in loco parentis fails to appear and is not represented by counsel, provided personal or substituted service was made on the person, or the court determines that such person cannot be found, after reasonable effort, or in the case of a person who is without the Commonwealth, the person cannot be found or his post office address cannot be ascertained after reasonable effort. Notice shall also be provided to the local department of social services, the guardian ad litem and, if appointed, the court-appointed special advocate.

If a child is found to be (a) abused or neglected; (b) at risk of being abused or neglected by a parent or custodian who has been adjudicated as having abused or neglected another child in his care; or (c) abandoned by his parent or other custodian, or without parental care and guardianship because of his parent’s absence or physical or mental incapacity, the juvenile court or the circuit court may make any of the following orders of disposition to protect the welfare of the child:

Enter an order pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-278

;

Permit the child to remain with his parent, subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order with respect to such child and his parent or other adult occupant of the same dwelling;

Prohibit or limit contact as the court deems appropriate between the child and his parent or other adult occupant of the same dwelling whose presence tends to endanger the child’s life, health or normal development. The prohibition may exclude any such individual from the home under such conditions as the court may prescribe for a period to be determined by the court but in no event for longer than 180 days from the date of such determination. A hearing shall be held within 150 days to determine further disposition of the matter that may include limiting or prohibiting contact for another 180 days;

Permit the local board of social services or a public agency designated by the community policy and management team to place the child, subject to the provisions of §

16.1-281

, in suitable family homes, child-caring institutions, residential facilities, or independent living arrangements with legal custody remaining with the parents or guardians. The local board or public agency and the parents or guardians shall enter into an agreement which shall specify the responsibilities of each for the care and control of the child. The board or public agency that places the child shall have the final authority to determine the appropriate placement for the child. Nothing herein shall limit the authority of the court to review the child’s status in foster care in accordance with subsection G of §

16.1-281

or to review the foster care plan through a petition filed pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-282

.

Any order allowing a local board or public agency to place a child where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians as provided in this section shall be entered only upon a finding by the court that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent placement out of the home and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child; and the order shall so state.

After a finding that there is no less drastic alternative, transfer legal custody, subject to the provisions of § 16.1-281, to any of the following:

A person with a legitimate interest subject to the provisions of subsection A1;

A child welfare agency, private organization or facility that is licensed or otherwise authorized by law to receive and provide care for such child; however, a court shall not transfer legal custody of an abused or neglected child to an agency, organization or facility out of the Commonwealth without the approval of the Commissioner of Social Services; or

The local board of social services of the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction or, at the discretion of the court, to the local board of the county or city in which the child has residence if other than the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction. The local board shall accept the child for care and custody, provided that it has been given reasonable notice of the pendency of the case and an opportunity to be heard. However, in an emergency in the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction, the local board may be required to accept a child for a period not to exceed 14 days without prior notice or an opportunity to be heard if the judge entering the placement order describes the emergency and the need for such temporary placement in the order. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commitment of a child to any local board of social services in the Commonwealth when the local board consents to the commitment. The board to which the child is committed shall have the final authority to determine the appropriate placement for the child. Nothing herein shall limit the authority of the court to review the child’s status in foster care in accordance with subsection G of §

16.1-281

or to review the foster care plan through a petition filed pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-282

.

Any order authorizing removal from the home and transferring legal custody of a child to a local board of social services as provided in this section shall be entered only upon a finding by the court that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child; and the order shall so state.

A finding by the court that reasonable efforts were made to prevent removal of the child from his home shall not be required if the court finds that (i) the residual parental rights of the parent regarding a sibling of the child have previously been involuntarily terminated; (ii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time such offense occurred, or the other parent of the child; (iii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury or felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of such offense; or (iv) on the basis of clear and convincing evidence, the parent has subjected any child to aggravated circumstances, or abandoned a child under circumstances that would justify the termination of residual parental rights pursuant to subsection D of §

16.1-283

.

As used in this section:

“Aggravated circumstances”
means torture, chronic or severe abuse, or chronic or severe sexual abuse, if the victim of such conduct was a child of the parent or child with whom the parent resided at the time such conduct occurred, including the failure to protect such a child from such conduct, which conduct or failure to protect (i) evinces a wanton or depraved indifference to human life or (ii) has resulted in the death of such a child or in serious bodily injury to such a child.

“Chronic abuse”
or

“chronic sexual abuse”

means recurring acts of physical abuse that place the child’s health, safety and well-being at risk.

“Serious bodily injury”
means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty.

“Severe abuse”
or

“severe sexual abuse”

may include an act or omission that occurred only once but otherwise meets the definition of “aggravated circumstances.”

Transfer legal custody pursuant to subdivision 5 of this section and order the parent to participate in such services and programs or to refrain from such conduct as the court may prescribe; or

Terminate the rights of the parent pursuant to §

16.1-283

.

If the child has been placed in foster care, at the dispositional hearing the court shall review the foster care plan for the child filed in accordance with §

16.1-281

by the local department of social services, a public agency designated by the community policy and management team which places a child through an agreement with the parents or guardians where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians, or child welfare agency.

Any preliminary protective orders entered on behalf of the child shall be reviewed at the dispositional hearing and may be incorporated, as appropriate, in the dispositional order.

A dispositional order entered pursuant to this section is a final order from which an appeal may be taken in accordance with §

16.1-296

.

A1.

Any order transferring custody of the child to a person with a legitimate interest pursuant to subdivision A 5 a shall be entered only upon a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that such person is one who, after an investigation as directed by the court, (i) is found by the court to be willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; (iii) is committed to providing a permanent, suitable home for the child; and (iv) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect; and the order shall so state. The court’s order transferring custody to a person with a legitimate interest should further provide for, as appropriate, any terms or conditions which would promote the child’s interest and welfare; ongoing provision of social services to the child and the child’s custodian; and court review of the child’s placement.

History.

1991, c. 534; 1994, c. 865; 1997, c. 790; 2000, c. 385; 2002, c. 747; 2013, c. 130; 2017, c. 190; 2019, c. 434; 2022, c. 305.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

As to child support for child placed in foster care where legal custody remains with the parent or guardian, see §

63.2-910

.

As to appointment of a guardian or commitment to a custodial agency of a child who is deemed to be without proper custody upon denial of an adoption petition, see §

63.2-1209

.

As to execution of consent for parental placement adoptions, and exceptions to consent requirements, see §

63.2-1233

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts
2013, c. 130, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385, in subdivision A 5 a, inserted “interested” and substituted “subject to the provisions of subsection A1 of this section” for “who, after study, is found by the court to be qualified to receive and care for the child”; added subsection A1; and in subsection B, inserted “in accordance with §

16.1-281

” and substituted “a public agency designated by the community policy and management team which places a child through an agreement with the parents or guardians where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians, or child welfare agency” for “in accordance with §

16.1-281

.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) in the second paragraph of the introductory language of subsection A; deleted “public welfare or” following “local board of” three times in subdivision A 5 c; deleted “of subsection A of this section” following “subdivision A 5 a” in subsection A1; and made stylistic changes throughout subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 130, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Within 60 days” for “Within seventy-five days” at the beginning of the first paragraph of subsection A, and substitued “14” for “fourteen” near the end of subdivision A 5 c.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 190 added the third paragraph and the definitions at the end of subdivision A 5 c.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 434, in subdivision A 5 a., substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual,” and deleted “of this section” from the end; and in subsection A1, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual” twice, and substituted “such person” for “the relative or other interested individual.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 305 in subdivision A 4 in the first paragraph and in subdivision A 5 c in the first paragraph, added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1439 (1978).

For article discussing the involuntary commitment of minors in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 695 (1979).

For comment on termination of parental rights, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 213 (1980).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

For article on termination of indigents’ parental rights, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 731 (1982).

For article on the effect of subsection M of this section, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 787 (1982).

For comment on Doe v. Doe,

222 Va. 736

, 284 S.E.2d 799 (1981) as to fitness of homosexuals as parents, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 851 (1982).

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For 1987 survey of Virginia law as to children, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1987).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For annual survey article, see “Family Law,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

§ 16.1-278.3.
Relief of care and custody.

Within 60 days of a hearing on a petition for relief of the care and custody of any child pursuant to §

16.1-277.02

at which the court found (i) good cause for the petitioner’s desire to be relieved of a child’s care and custody or (ii) that permanent relief of custody and termination of residual parental rights is in the best interest of the child, a dispositional hearing shall be held, if a final order disposing of the matter was not entered at the conclusion of the hearing on the petition held pursuant to §

16.1-277.02

.

Notice of the dispositional hearing shall be provided to the local department of social services, the guardian ad litem for the child, the child if he is at least 12 years of age, and the child’s parents, custodian or other person standing in loco parentis. However, if a parent’s residual parental rights were terminated at the hearing on the petition held pursuant to §

16.1-277.02

, no such notice of the hearing pursuant to this section shall be provided to the parent. The hearing shall be held and a dispositional order may be entered, although a parent, guardian, legal custodian or person standing in loco parentis fails to appear and is not represented by counsel, provided personal or substituted service was made on the person, or the court determines that the person cannot be found, after reasonable effort, or in the case of a person who is without the Commonwealth, the person cannot be found or his post office address cannot be ascertained after reasonable effort. However, in the case of a hearing to grant a petition for permanent relief of custody and terminate a parent’s residual parental rights, notice to the parent whose rights may be affected shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of §§

16.1-263

and

16.1-264

.

The court may make any of the orders of disposition permitted in a case involving an abused or neglected child pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

. Any such order transferring legal custody of the child shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A 5 of §

16.1-278.2

and shall be subject to the provisions of subsection D1. This order shall include, but need not be limited to, the following findings: (i) that there is no less drastic alternative to granting the requested relief; and (ii) that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, if the order transfers legal custody of the child to a local board of social services. Any preliminary protective orders entered on behalf of the child shall be reviewed at the dispositional hearing and may be incorporated, as appropriate, in the dispositional order. If the child has been placed in foster care, at the dispositional hearing the court shall review the foster care plan for the child filed by the local board of social services or child welfare agency in accordance with §

16.1-281

.

If the parent or other custodian seeks to be relieved permanently of the care and custody of any child and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that termination of the parent’s parental rights is in the best interest of the child, the court may terminate the parental rights of that parent. If the remaining parent has not petitioned for permanent relief of the care and custody of the child, the remaining parent’s parental rights may be terminated in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-283

. Any order terminating parental rights shall be accompanied by an order (i) continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency or (ii) granting custody or guardianship to a person with a legitimate interest. Such an order continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency shall indicate whether that board or agency shall have the authority to place the child for adoption and consent thereto. Proceedings under this section shall be advanced on the docket so as to provide for their earliest practicable disposition. At any time subsequent to the transfer of legal custody of the child pursuant to this section, a birth parent or parents of the child and the pre-adoptive parent or parents may enter into a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-283

.1 and Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2. The court shall not require a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement as a precondition to entry of an order in any case involving the child.

The local board or licensed child-placing agency to which authority is given to place the child for adoption and consent thereto after an order terminating parental rights is entered pursuant to this section shall file a written Adoption Progress Report with the juvenile court on the progress being made to place the child in an adoptive home. The report shall be filed with the court every six months from the date of the final order terminating parental rights until a final order of adoption is entered on behalf of the child in the circuit court. At the conclusion of the hearing at which termination of parental rights is ordered and authority is given to the local board or licensed child-placing agency to place the child for adoption, the juvenile court shall schedule a date by which the board or agency shall file the first Adoption Progress Report required by this section. A copy of the Adoption Progress Report shall be sent by the court to the guardian ad litem for the child. The court may schedule a hearing on the report with or without the request of a party.

A dispositional order entered pursuant to this section is a final order from which an appeal may be taken in accordance with §

16.1-296

.

D1.

Any order transferring custody of the child to a person with a legitimate interest pursuant to subsection C or D shall be entered only upon a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that such person is one who, after an investigation as directed by the court, (i) is found by the court to be willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; (iii) is committed to providing a permanent, suitable home for the child; and (iv) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect; and the order shall so state. The court’s order transferring custody to a person with a legitimate interest should further provide for, as appropriate, any terms or conditions which would promote the child’s interest and welfare; ongoing provision of social services to the child and the child’s custodian; and court review of the child’s placement.

History.

1991, c. 534; 1999, c. 889; 2000, c. 385; 2009, cc. 98, 260; 2010, c. 331; 2013, c. 130; 2019, c. 434.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

As to appointment of a guardian or commitment to a custodial agency of a child who is deemed to be without proper custody upon denial of an adoption petition, see §

63.2-1209

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2013, c. 130, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014.”

The 1999 amendment

rewrote this section, which formerly read: “When a parent or other custodian seeks to be relieved of the care and custody of any child pursuant to subdivision A 4 of §

16.1-241

or when a public or private agency seeks to gain approval of an entrustment agreement pursuant to § 63.1-56 or § 63.1-204, the juvenile court or the circuit court may, after compliance with §

16.1-277

, make any of the orders of disposition permitted in a case involving an abused or neglected child pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

.

“If the parent or other custodian seeks to be relieved permanently of the care and custody of any child or when a public or private agency seeks to gain approval of a permanent entrustment agreement entered into pursuant to § 63.1-56 or § 63.1-204, the juvenile court or the circuit court may, after compliance with §

16.1-277

, terminate the parental rights of the parent or other custodian and appoint a local board of public welfare or social services or a licensed child-placing agency as custodian of the child with the authority to place the child for adoption and consent thereto.
The remaining parent’s parental rights may be terminated even though that parent has not entered into an entrustment agreement if the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interests of the child and that (i) the identity of the parent is not reasonably ascertainable; (ii) the identity and whereabouts of the parent are known or reasonably ascertainable, and the parent is personally served with notice of the termination proceeding pursuant to §

8.01-296

or §

8.01-320

; (iii) the whereabouts of the parent are not reasonably ascertainable and the parent is given notice of termination proceedings by certified or registered mail to the last known address and such parent fails to object to the proceedings within twenty-one days of the mailing of such notice; or (iv) the whereabouts of the parent are not reasonably ascertainable and the parent is given notice of termination proceedings through an order of publication, published at least once per week in a newspaper having general circulation in the area for a period of four weeks, and such parent fails to object to the proceedings.
Proceedings under this section shall be advanced on the docket so as to provide for their earliest practicable disposition.
No order of disposition pursuant to this section shall be made over the objection of any party, if the disposition was not provided for or requested in the entrustment agreement or in the petition’s prayer for relief.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385 inserted the present second and third sentences in subsection C and added subsection D1.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 98 and 260 are identical, and added the last two sentences in subsection D.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 331 substituted “§

16.1-283.1

and Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2” for “§§

16.1-283.1

and

63.2-1228.1

” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection D and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 130, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Within 60 days” for “Within 75 days” at the beginning of subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 434, in subsections D and D1, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual” three times; in subsection D1, substituted “such person” for “the relative or other interested individual” and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent & Child, § 11.

§ 16.1-278.4.
Children in need of services.

If a child is found to be in need of services or a status offender, the juvenile court or the circuit court may make any of the following orders of disposition for the supervision, care and rehabilitation of the child:

Enter an order pursuant to the provisions of §

16.1-278

.

Permit the child to remain with his parent subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order with respect to such child and his parent.

Order the parent with whom the child is living to participate in such programs, cooperate in such treatment or be subject to such conditions and limitations as the court may order and as are designed for the rehabilitation of the child and his parent.

Beginning July 1, 1992, in the case of any child fourteen years of age or older, where the court finds that the child is not able to benefit appreciably from further schooling, the court may excuse the child from further compliance with any legal requirement of compulsory school attendance as provided under § 22.1-254 or authorize the child, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, to be employed in any occupation which is not legally declared hazardous for children under the age of eighteen.

Permit the local board of social services or a public agency designated by the community policy and management team to place the child, subject to the provisions of §

16.1-281

, in suitable family homes, child caring-institutions, residential facilities, or independent living arrangements with legal custody remaining with the parents or guardians. The local board or public agency and the parents or guardians shall enter into an agreement which shall specify the responsibilities of each for the care and control of the child. The board or public agency that places the child shall have the final authority to determine the appropriate placement for the child. Nothing herein shall limit the authority of the court to review the child’s status in foster care in accordance with subsection G of §

16.1-281

or to review the foster care plan through a petition filed pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-282

.

Any order allowing a local board or public agency to place a child where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians as provided in this section shall be entered only upon a finding by the court that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent placement out of the home and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, and the order shall so state.

Transfer legal custody to any of the following:

A relative or other individual who, after study, is found by the court to be qualified to receive and care for the child;

A child welfare agency, private organization or facility that is licensed or otherwise authorized by law to receive and provide care for such child. The court shall not transfer legal custody of a child in need of services to an agency, organization or facility out of the Commonwealth without the approval of the Commissioner of Social Services; or

The local board of social services of the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction or, at the discretion of the court, to the local board of the county or city in which the child has residence if other than the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction. The local board shall accept the child for care and custody, provided that it has been given reasonable notice of the pendency of the case and an opportunity to be heard. However, in an emergency in the county or city in which the court has jurisdiction, the local board may be required to accept a child for a period not to exceed fourteen days without prior notice or an opportunity to be heard if the judge entering the placement order describes the emergency and the need for such temporary placement in the order. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the commitment of a child to any local board of social services in the Commonwealth when the local board consents to the commitment. The board to which the child is committed shall have the final authority to determine the appropriate placement for the child. Nothing herein shall limit the authority of the court to review the child’s status in foster care in accordance with subsection G of §

16.1-281

or to review the foster care plan through a petition filed pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-282

.

Any order authorizing removal from the home and transferring legal custody of a child to a local board of social services as provided in this subdivision shall be entered only upon a finding by the court that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, and the order shall so state.

A finding by the court that reasonable efforts were made to prevent removal of the child from his home shall not be required if the court finds that (i) the residual parental rights of the parent regarding a sibling of the child have previously been involuntarily terminated; (ii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time such offense occurred, or the other parent of the child; (iii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury or felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of such offense; or (iv) on the basis of clear and convincing evidence, the parent has subjected any child to aggravated circumstances, or abandoned a child under circumstances that would justify the termination of residual parental rights pursuant to subsection D of §

16.1-283

.

As used in this section:

“Aggravated circumstances”
means torture, chronic or severe abuse, or chronic or severe sexual abuse, if the victim of such conduct was a child of the parent or child with whom the parent resided at the time such conduct occurred, including the failure to protect such a child from such conduct, which conduct or failure to protect (i) evinces a wanton or depraved indifference to human life or (ii) has resulted in the death of such a child or in serious bodily injury to such a child.

“Chronic abuse”
or

“chronic sexual abuse”

means recurring acts of physical abuse that place the child’s health, safety and well-being at risk.

“Serious bodily injury”
means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty.

“Severe abuse”
or

“severe sexual abuse”

may include an act or omission that occurred only once but otherwise meets the definition of “aggravated circumstances.”

Require the child to participate in a public service project under such conditions as the court prescribes.

History.

1991, c. 534; 1994, c. 865; 1997, c. 463; 1999, cc. 488, 552; 2002, c. 747; 2017, c. 190; 2022, c. 305.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, placement of child, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and substituted “§ 22.1-254” for “§ 22.1-257” in subdivision 4.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted “that” for “which”’ following “agency” in the last sentence of the first paragraph of subdivision 5; substituted “that” for “which” following “facility” in the first sentence of subdivision 6 b; and deleted “public welfare or” following “local board of” three times in subdivision 6 c.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 190 added the third paragraph and the definitions at the end of subdivision 6 c.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 305 in subdivision 5 in the first paragraph and in subdivision 6 c in the first paragraph, added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).